District of Columbia statutes.
2-1226.39

Exemptions to requirements.

(a)

The DDOE may grant, upon a showing of good cause, an exemption from a requirement of this part, in whole or in part, if:

(1)

The substantial weight of the evidence is of a practical infeasibility or hardship of meeting the requirement; and

(2)

The public interest would be better served by the exemption.

(b)

When considering a request for an exemption, the DDOE may consider alternative measures proposed by the applicant.

(c)

The DDOE shall give notice of any exemption granted pursuant to this section to the Council and affected Advisory Neighborhood Commission no less than 10 days from the date the exemption is granted. Notice of the exemption shall be published in the District of Columbia Register before the exemption may take effect.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 459, 55 DCR 1689
Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-192, § 2(g), 59 DCR 10174
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-192 substituted “DDOE” for “Mayor” throughout the section; and substituted “The substantial weight of the evidence is” for “There is evidence” in (a)(1).